Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4703
Certificate of authority; required.

No person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity may operate a prepaid limited health service organization in this state without obtaining and maintaining a certificate of authority from the director pursuant to the Prepaid Limited Health Service Organization Act.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 255.